Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1209.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1721(a) and (c) of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 1721. Veterans' Trust Fund.(a) Source of revenue.--In addition to transfers under section 1719-G of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, the Veterans' Trust Fund shall include funds from the following sources:* * *(2.2) Amounts collected and payable to the fund under 12345678910111213141516171819 section 9305 (relating to veterans' claims assistance standards).* * *(c) Authorized purposes.--The department may expend money from the Veterans' Trust Fund for the following purposes:* * *(8) Grants under section 9304 (relating to g rants to veterans' service officer programs).* * *Section 2. Section 9304(a) introductory paragraph of Title 51 is amended to read:§ 9304. Grants to veterans' service officer programs.(a) Award allocations.--From funds specifically appropriated for this purpose a nd from money in the Veterans' Trust Fund under section 1721 (relating to Veterans' Trust Fund), the department shall award grants to designated veterans' service organizations to support veterans' service officer programs. Grants awarded under this section shall be used solely to support accredited veterans' service officers and the associated costs, including:* * * Section 3. Title 51 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 9305. Veterans' claims assistance standards.(a) Applicability.--This section shall apply to a person that, for compensation, assists a veteran, service member or eligible dependent with the preparation, presentation or prosecution of a claim for veterans' benefits.(b) Nonapplicability.--This section shall not apply to any of the following:(1) A county director of veterans affairs or an employee 20260SB1209PN1508 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of a county veterans affairs office acting in the course of official duties.(2) An employee of the department acting in the course of official duties.(3) A member of the Congress of the United States or an employee of the Congress of the United States acting in the course of official duties.(4) A member of the General Assembly or an employee of the General Assembly acting in the course of official duties.(5) An accredited representative of a congressionally chartered veterans' service organization, as authorized under 38 U.S.C. § 5902 (relating to recognition of representatives of organizations).(6) An accredited agent or attorney operating under 38 CFR 14.629 (relating to requirements for accreditation of service organization representatives; agents; and attorneys).(7) A nonprofit organization that assists veterans without charging compensation of any kind.(8) An individual providing informal support to a family member or friend without receiving or expecting compensation.(c) Registration.--A person subject to this section shall register annually with the department on a form and manner specified by the department. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH A LIST OF ALL REGISTERED ENTITIES ON ITS PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE. Registration shall include all of the following: (1) The name and contact information of the person providing services.(2) Disclosure of accreditation status under 38 CFR 14.629, if applicable.(3) A description of services offered, including whether 20260SB1209PN1508 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assistance includes claim preparation, presentation, consultation or related support.(4) A statement of all fees and compensation structures the person intends to charge for veterans' benefits assistance.(5) Each county in which the person will offer services.(d) Written disclosure.--(1) Before a person subject to this section provides services to a veteran, service member or eligible dependent, the person shall provide the veteran, service member or eligible dependent with a written disclosure. The written disclosure shall include all of the following:(i) A statement that free assistance is available from county directors of veterans affairs, congressionally chartered veterans' service organizations and accredited representatives.(ii) A clear explanation of all fees, charges or compensation the person may collect in connection with a veterans' benefits matter.(iii) A description of the specific services the person will perform, including whether the person will prepare, present or consult on a veterans' benefits claim.(iv) A statement of whether the person is accredited under 38 CFR 14.629 and, if accredited, the category of accreditation.(v) A notice that the United States Department of Veterans Affairs does not require paid assistance to file a veterans' benefits claim and that filing a claim through a paid provider does not guarantee a favorable 20260SB1209PN1508 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 outcome or a specific disability rating.(vi) An acknowledgment signature line for the veteran, service member or eligible dependent confirming receipt of the disclosure.(2) A person subject to this section shall provide the disclosure under paragraph (1) in printed form and in an electronic format accessible online. The disclosure shall appear in large, clear and readable font and shall be written in plain, easily understandable English.(e) Advertising disclosure.--A person subject to this section that advertises veterans' benefits claim assistance services shall include the following disclosure in the advertisement:This business is not sponsored by or affiliated with the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or the Pennsylvania Department of Military and Veterans Affairs or any other federally chartered veterans' service organization. Other organizations, including the Pennsylvania Department of Military and Veterans Affairs, your local county veterans service agency and other federally chartered veterans' service organizations, may be able to provide you with these services free of charge. You may qualify for other veterans' benefits beyond the services that this business offers.(f) Prohibited practices.--A person subject to this section may not:(1) Directly solicit an individual veteran, service member or eligible dependent by telephone, text message, email, social media or in person for the purpose of offering veterans' benefits assistance.20260SB1209PN1508 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Promise, guarantee or imply a specific outcome, veterans' benefits level, disability rating or increase in veterans' benefits.(3) Utilize an international call center for the processing of a veteran's personal information.(4) Obtain, request or retain a veteran's personal medical, financial or government benefits login credentials, including usernames or passwords.(5) Receive compensation for referring or directing a veteran, service member or eligible dependent to another person for veterans' benefits claim assistance services.(6) REPRESENT THAT A PERSON HAS SPECIAL ACCESS TO GOVERNMENT CLAIMS SYSTEMS OR THE ABILITY TO EXPEDITE VETERANS' BENEFITS CLAIMS.(g) Data security and access.--(1) A person subject to this section shall maintain a veteran's personal medical and financial information only on a secure system or server that complies with applicable standards of the National Institute of Standards and Technology on the effective date of this paragraph.(2) Before a person subject to this section authorizes an individual to access a veteran's personal medical or financial information, the person shall ensure that the individual submits to and passes a background check conducted by a reputable source that includes identity verification and a criminal history records check.(3) A PERSON SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY NOT REQUEST, REQUIRE OR INDUCE A VETERAN, SERVICE MEMBER OR DEPENDENT TO PROVIDE LOGIN CREDENTIALS, PASSWORDS, AUTHENTICATION TOKENS OR OTHER SECURE ACCESS INFORMATION FOR ANY FEDERAL OR STATE 20260SB1209PN1508 - 6 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 VETERANS' BENEFITS SYSTEM.(h) Compensation limits.--A person subject to this section may not charge or receive compensation for assisting with a veterans' benefits matter unless all of the following apply:(1) Compensation is contingent solely upon a successful increase in veterans' benefits and the person collects no fee or payment in advance.(2) If the claim results in an increase in veterans' benefits, compensation does not exceed the lesser of:(i) five times the amount of the monthly increase awarded based on the claim; or(ii) $12,500 total.(3) No compensation is due or payable until the veteran receives the increased veterans' benefits for at least one month.(i) Timing restrictions.-- A person subject to this section may not receive compensation for assisting with a veterans' benefits matter filed within 365 days of a veteran's release from active duty service. This subsection shall not apply if the veteran executes a written waiver acknowledging all of the following:(1) The veteran is within 365 days of release from active duty service.(2) Free assistance is available through county directors of veterans affairs, congressionally chartered veterans' service organizations or accredited representatives.(3) The veteran knowingly elects to receive compensated assistance.(j) Veterans' Trust Fund.-- Money collected under this 20260SB1209PN1508 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section shall be deposited into the Veterans' Trust Fund.(k) Penalties.--A person that violates this section commits a misdemeanor of the third degree. Each separate act that constitutes a violation of this section shall constitute a separate offense. In addition to criminal penalties, the department may impose a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 per violation MAY BE IMPOSED . (l) Enforcement.--The Office of Attorney General may investigate a complaint, issue a subpoena, review the record of a person subject to this section and take administrative action necessary to enforce this section.(L) ENFORCEMENT.--A CONTRACT ENTERED INTO IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE VOID AND UNENFORCEABLE, AND A PERSON MAY NOT COLLECT OR RETAIN COMPENSATION OBTAINED THROUGH A CONTRACT ENTERED INTO IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION. THE DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS MAY REFER SUSPECTED VIOLATIONS OF THIS SECTION TO:(1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL;(2) THE APPROPRIATE DISTRICT ATTORNEY; OR(3) ANY RELEVANT PROFESSIONAL LICENSING BOARD.(m) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Compensation." Anything of value, including a fee, commission, payment or other remuneration, received directly or indirectly in exchange for assistance described under subsection (a)."Eligible dependent." A dependent eligible to receive veterans' benefits through a veteran or service member."Service member." An individual who serves in the United 20260SB1209PN1508 - 8 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 States Armed Forces, including a reserve component or the Pennsylvania National Guard."Veteran." An individual who served in the United States Armed Forces, including a reserve component or the Pennsylvania National Guard, and who was discharged or released from service under conditions other than dishonorable."Veterans' benefits." Benefits, programs, services or payments administered by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.Section 4. This act shall take effect in one year.20260SB1209PN1508 - 9 - 12345678910